Oklahoma, session 2025, SB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Beginning with the 2026 program year, the Department of Human


Services shall opt into and administer the Summer Electronic


Benefits Transfer (Summer EBT) program created under the federal


Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023. The Department shall submit


the necessary documents and fulfill any federal requirements


necessary to participate in the Summer EBT program beginning with


the 2026 program year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-757 DC 12/30/2024 2:11:47 PM

Req. No. 757 Page 1